New York, session 2025-2026, S5582.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 210 to read as follows: 3 § 210. Human trafficking recognition training. 1. Human trafficking 4 recognition training program. a. Any establishment that constitutes a 5 gaming facility as defined by subdivision twenty-three of section thir- 6 teen hundred one of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, 7 shall require all employees to undergo a human trafficking recognition 8 training program which shall be established or approved by the division 9 of criminal justice services and the office of temporary and disability 10 assistance in consultation with the New York state interagency task 11 force on human trafficking. However, for class III gaming establish- 12 ments authorized under the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. § 13 2701, et seq., the gaming commission shall make available, upon request, 14 such human-trafficking recognition training program. 15 b. The training program may be developed by a federal, state, or non- 16 profit organization, and may be incorporated as part of the gaming 17 facility's existing training programs or may be provided by organiza- 18 tions or providers identified by the commissioner of the division of 19 criminal justice services or the commissioner of the office of temporary 20 and disability assistance, provided that the training includes all of 21 the requirements of this section. Established or approved training 22 programs may be made available through methods including, but not limit- 23 ed to, in-person instruction, electronic and video communication, or 24 online programs. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09662-01-5 S. 5582 2 1 c. Any human trafficking recognition training program established or 2 approved by the division of criminal justice services and the office of 3 temporary and disability assistance in consultation with the New York 4 state interagency task force on human trafficking as required by this 5 section shall address no less than the following issues: 6 (i) the nature of human trafficking; 7 (ii) how human trafficking is defined in law; 8 (iii) how to identify victims of human trafficking; 9 (iv) relief and recovery options for survivors; and 10 (v) social and legal services available to victims. 11 d. The commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and 12 the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assistance 13 shall make available a list of established or approved human trafficking 14 recognition programs for use by a gaming facility. 15 e. All new employees required to receive human trafficking recognition 16 training shall receive such training within their first month of employ- 17 ment. 18 f. The training shall take place on the premises of the gaming facili- 19 ty and shall be considered compensable time. 20 2. Record keeping requirements of human trafficking recognition train- 21 ing. Every keeper of each gaming facility shall maintain records indi- 22 cating that each employee required to undergo an established or approved 23 human trafficking recognition training program pursuant to this section 24 has completed such training. Such records shall be kept on file by the 25 gaming facility for the period during which the employee is employed by 26 the gaming facility and for one year after such employment ends. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 28 have become a law; provided however, paragraph d of subdivision 1 of 29 section 210 of the general business law as added by section one of this 30 act, shall take effect immediately; provided further that all current 31 employees of gaming facilities on the effective date of this act shall 32 receive human-trafficking recognition training pursuant to this act 33 within four months of the effective date of this act.